Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 9 Victim Restitution
§ 7-9-113.
Restitution for long-term care.

In addition to any other punishment prescribed by law and any restitution ordered pursuant to W.S.

7-9-102

which did not include long-term physical health care costs, the court may, upon conviction of any misdemeanor or felony, order a defendant to pay restitution to a victim in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

7-9-114

if the victim has suffered physical injury as a result of the crime which is reasonably probable to require or has required long-term physical health care for more than three (3) months.

As used in W.S.

7-9-113

through

7-9-115

“long-term physical health care” includes mental health care.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 167, § 1; 2000, ch. 90, § 1.

Restitution upheld. —

As part of a sentence for aggravated assault and battery, order that defendant pay $2,116.66 to defray the costs of long-term health care for the victim was appropriate, despite defendant's contention that he had no reasonable ability to pay while incarcerated. Hodgins v. State, 962 P.2d 153,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1998).

§ 7-9-114.
Determination of long-term restitution; time for order; enforcement.

In determining the amount of restitution to be ordered for long-term physical health care, the court shall consider the factors stated in W.S.

7-9-106

together with an estimated monthly cost of long-term physical health care of the victim provided by the victim or his representative. The victim’s estimate of long-term physical health care costs may be made as part of a victim impact statement under W.S.

7-21-103

or made separately. The court shall enter the long-term physical health care restitution order at the time of sentencing. An order of restitution made pursuant to this section shall fix a monthly amount to be paid by the defendant for as long as long-term physical health care of the victim is required as a result of the crime. The order may exceed the length of any sentence imposed upon the defendant for the criminal activity. The court shall include as a special finding in the judgment of conviction its determination of the monthly cost of long-term physical health care.

Restitution ordered under this section shall be paid as provided in W.S.

7-9-108

. The restitution order shall be a civil judgment against the defendant and may be enforced by any means provided for enforcing other restitution orders and civil judgments.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 167, § 1.

Payment of victim's long-term health care. —

As part of a sentence for aggravated assault and battery, order that defendant pay $2,116.66 to defray the costs of long-term health care for the victim was appropriate, despite defendant's contention that he had no reasonable ability to pay while incarcerated. Hodgins v. State, 962 P.2d 153,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1998).

Cited

in

Crapo v. State, 2007 WY 194, 172 P.3d 393,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Dec. 11, 2007); Shafer v. State, 2015 WY 38,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Mar. 9, 2015).

§ 7-9-115.
Modification of order.

After a long-term physical health care restitution order has been entered, the court may from time to time, on the petition of either the defendant or the victim, or upon its own motion, modify the order as to the amount of monthly payments. Any modification of the order shall only be based upon a substantial change of circumstances relating to the cost of long-term physical health care or the financial condition of either the defendant or the victim. The petition shall be filed as part of the original criminal docket.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 167, § 1.